District of Columbia statutes.
2-708

Penalties.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person who, at the time of the mailing, is not a government employee and who mails or attempts to mail materials, documents, or other items as official mail shall be fined an amount not exceeding $100 or confined for a term not exceeding 1 year.

(b)

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter shall be subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 or confined for a term not exceeding 1 year, plus double the amount of money incidental to the unlawful mailing.

Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-118, § 9, 23 DCR 8746
This section is referenced in § 2-710.
1981 Ed., § 1-1708.
1973 Ed., § 1-1708.